Mississippi, session 2026, HB837.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  No judge of any circuit court shall provide an opportunity for any political candidate to address the public during court terms. SECTION 2.  Section 23-15-973, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-973.  * * *It shall be the duty of the judges of the circuit court to give a reasonable time and opportunity to the candidates for the office of judge of the Supreme Court, judges of the Court of Appeals, circuit judge, chancellor and justice court judge to address the people during court terms. In order to give further and every possible emphasis to the fact that the judicial offices are not political but are to be held without favor and with absolute impartiality as to all persons, and because of the jurisdiction conferred upon the courts by this chapter, the judges of those offices should be as far removed as possible from any political affiliations or obligations. Circuit court judges shall not authorize or otherwise provide an opportunity for any candidate for the office of Supreme Court justice, Court of Appeals judge, circuit judge, or chancery court judge to address the public during court terms. It shall be unlawful for any candidate for any of the offices mentioned in this section to align himself or herself with any candidate or candidates for any other office or with any political faction or any political party at any time during any primary or general election campaign.  Likewise it shall be unlawful for any candidate for any other office nominated or to be nominated at any primary election, wherein any candidate for any of the judicial offices in this section mentioned, is or are to be nominated, to align himself or herself with any one or more of the candidates for the offices or to take any part whatever in any nomination for any one or more of the judicial offices, except to cast his or her individual vote.  Any candidate for any office, whether nominated with or without opposition, at any primary wherein a candidate for any one (1) of the judicial offices herein mentioned is to be nominated who shall deliberately, knowingly and willfully violate the provisions of this section shall forfeit his or her nomination, or if elected at the following general election by virtue of the nomination, his or her election shall be void. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.